Vermont statutes. Title 15 Domestic Relations
Chapter 1. Civil Marriage

§ 1.
Repealed. 2009, No. 3, § 12.

§ 1a.
Person forbidden to marry a relative.

No person shall marry his or her parent, grandparent, child, grandchild, sibling, sibling’s child, or parent’s sibling.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 3

, § 3, eff. Sept. 1, 2009.

§ 2.
Repealed. 2009, No. 3, § 12.

§ 3.
Bar though civil marriage dissolved.

If the relationship in those cases mentioned in section 1 of this title is founded on a civil marriage, the prohibition shall continue in force notwithstanding the dissolution of such marriage by death or divorce, unless the divorce is for a cause that shows the marriage to have been originally unlawful or void.

HISTORY:

Amended

2009, No. 3

, § 12a, eff. Sept. 1, 2009.

§ 4.
Civil marriage contracted while one in force.

Civil marriages contracted while either party is legally married or joined in civil union to a living person other than the party to that marriage shall be void.

HISTORY:

Amended

1999, No. 91

(Adj. Sess.), § 24;

2009, No. 3

, §§ 4, 12a, eff. Sept. 1, 2009.

§§ 5,
6.
Repealed. 2009, No. 3, § 12.

§ 7.
Affirmance of civil marriage by decree of court.

When the validity of a civil marriage is denied or doubted by either of the parties, the other party may file a libel for affirming the marriage.
Upon proof of the validity thereof, it shall be declared valid by a decree of the court.
Such decree shall be conclusive upon persons concerned.

HISTORY:

Amended

2009, No. 3

, § 12a, eff. Sept. 1, 2009.

§ 8.
Marriage definition.

Marriage is the legally recognized union of two people. When used in this chapter or in any other statute, the word “marriage” shall mean a civil marriage. Terms relating to the marital relationship or familial relationships shall be construed consistently with this section for all purposes throughout the law, whether in the context of statute, administrative or court rule, policy, common law, or any other source of civil law.

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 91

(Adj. Sess.), § 25;

2009, No. 3

, §§ 5, 12a, eff. Sept. 1, 2009.